Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2449
Automated medication distribution machine; requirements; drugs; limitations; inventory; how treated.

(1) An automated medication distribution machine:

(a) Is subject to the requirements of section 71-2447 and, if it is in a long-term care automated pharmacy, is subject to section 71-2451; and

(b) Subject to section 71-2451, may be operated or used in a hospital, long-term care facility, or assisted-living facility for medication administration pursuant to a chart order or prescription by a licensed health care professional.

(2) Drugs placed in an automated medication distribution machine shall be in the manufacturer's original packaging or in containers repackaged in compliance with state and federal laws, rules, and regulations relating to repackaging, labeling, and record keeping.

(3) The inventory which is transferred to an automated medication distribution machine in a hospital shall be excluded from the percent of total prescription drug sales revenue described in section 71-7454.

Laws 2008, LB308, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 77;

Laws 2013, LB326, § 8;

Laws 2022, LB592, § 1.